Louisiana, session 2026, HB1090.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:52.1(B) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 14:52.1(C) is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§52.1. Simple arson of a religious building
* * *
B. Whoever commits the crime of simple arson of a religious building shall
be fined not more than fifteen twenty thousand dollars and imprisoned at hard labor
for not less than two eight nor more than fifteen thirty years. At least two years of
the sentence of imprisonment shall be imposed without benefit of parole, probation,
or suspension of sentence.
C. When injury or death occurs due to a violation of this Section, the
offender shall be fined not more than twenty thousand dollars and imprisoned at hard
labor for not less than twelve nor more than thirty years. At least two years of the
sentence of imprisonment shall be imposed without benefit of parole, probation, or
suspension of sentence.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2733 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1090